District of Columbia statutes.
29-104.14

Personal jurisdiction.

The designation or maintenance in the District of a registered agent shall not by itself create the basis for personal jurisdiction over the represented entity in the District.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(a)(28), 59 DCR 13171

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “designation” for “appointment”.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.